District of Columbia statutes.
7-1671.11

Liability.

(a)

No liability shall be imposed by virtue of this chapter upon any duly authorized District officer engaged in the enforcement of any law relating to controlled substances.

(b)

The District shall not be held liable for any deleterious outcomes from the use of medical marijuana, including the acts or omissions of any qualifying patient attributed to the use of medical marijuana.

Feb. 25, 2010, D.C. Law 13-315, § 12
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-210, § 2, 57 DCR 4798